Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.325

Deactivation of housing authority—Distribution of assets.

The assets of an authority in the process of deactivation shall be applied and distributed as follows:

(1) All liabilities and obligations of the authority shall be paid, satisfied, and discharged, or adequate provision shall be made therefor;

(2) Assets held by the authority upon condition requiring return, transfer, or conveyance, which condition occurs by reason of the deactivation shall be returned, transferred, or conveyed in accordance with such requirements;

(3) Assets received and held by the authority subject to limitations permitting their use only for activities purposes contained in RCW 35.82.070, but not held upon a condition requiring return, transfer, or conveyance by reason of the deactivation, shall be transferred or conveyed to the governing body of the city, town, or county and used to engage in activities contained in RCW 35.82.070;

(4) Other assets, if any, shall be returned to the governing body of the city, town, or county for uses allowed under state law.

[ 1987 c 275 s 2.]